Nevada, session 83, SB200.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 368A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a nonprofit
religious, charitable, fraternal or other organization that qualifies
as a tax-exempt organization pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c), or a
nonprofit corporation organized or existing under the provisions
of chapter 82 of NRS, provides an activity that is taxable under
this chapter in a county whose population is less than 9,000 and
the number of tickets to the activity offered for sale or other
distribution is 15,000 or more, the board of county commissioners
of the county may submit an application to the Department for
reimbursement of costs that were incurred by the county related to
the activity.
2. Any application submitted by a board of county
commissioners pursuant to this section:
(a) Must be submitted to the Department, on a form prescribed
by the Department, not later than 90 days after the date on which
the activity concludes.
(b) Must include, without limitation:
(1) An itemized list of any direct costs incurred by the
county related to the activity for which the county is applying for
reimbursement;
(2) An itemized list of any costs related to the activity that
were paid for, or for which the county was reimbursed, by the tax-
exempt organization or nonprofit corporation that provided the
activity; and
(3) Any other information required by the Department.
-
*SB200*

– 3 –
(c) May include an itemized list of indirect or incidental costs
incurred by the county related to the activity for which the county
is applying for reimbursement.
3. A board of county commissioners shall not request
reimbursement pursuant to this section for:
(a) Any costs related to the activity that were paid for, or for
which the county was reimbursed, by the tax-exempt organization
or nonprofit corporation that provided the activity.
(b) Indirect or incidental costs incurred by the county related
to the activity in an amount that exceeds 20 percent of the total
direct costs incurred by the county related to the activity.
(c) More than $750,000 in total direct, indirect and incidental
costs that were incurred by the county in any 1 fiscal year related
to activities for which the county is authorized to apply for
reimbursement of costs pursuant to this section.
4. The Executive Director shall review any application
submitted pursuant to this section to determine whether the
application is complete and complies with the requirements of this
section. If the Executive Director requests any additional
information relating to the application from the board of county
commissioners, the board of county commissioners must submit
such information not later than 15 days after the Executive
Director makes such a request.
5. If the Executive Director determines that an application
submitted pursuant to this section is complete and complies with
the requirements of this section, the Executive Director shall
submit the application to the Nevada Tax Commission for
approval or denial. If the Nevada Tax Commission:
(a) Approves the application, the State Controller shall
transfer the amount of the reimbursement approved by the Nevada
Tax Commission from the State General Fund to the county
treasurer of the county that submitted the application for deposit
in the county general fund.
(b) Denies the application, the board of county commissioners
that submitted the application may appeal the denial, in writing, to
the Nevada Tax Commission within 30 days after the denial of the
application. The board of county commissioners may not appeal
the denial of an application pursuant to this paragraph more than
once.
H
-
*SB200*